Arkansas, session 2025, HB1113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - COLLEGE SAVINGS & HIGHER EDUCATION BONDS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Office of the Treasurer of State, to be
payable from the College Savings Bond Fund, for the purpose of meeting the
debt service requirements of the State of Arkansas College Savings General
Obligation Bonds authorized and issued under the provisions of Arkansas Code
6-62-701 through 6-62-726 and the State of Arkansas Higher Education General
Obligation Bonds authorized and issued under provisions of Arkansas Code 6-
62-1101 through 6-62-1122 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

*JAR020*
01/07/2025 2:29:17 PM JAR020

HB1113
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS $10,000,000
(02) DEBT SERVICE 32,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $42,000,000

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - WATER, WASTE DISPOSAL & POLLUTION ABATEMENT.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Office of the Treasurer of State, to be
payable from the Water, Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement Facilities
Bond Fund, for the purpose of meeting the debt service requirements of the
Water, Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement General Obligation Bonds which
are authorized and issued under the provisions of Arkansas Code 15-22-601
through 15-22-622 and Arkansas Code 15-22-701 through 15-22-721, for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS $15,000,000
(02) DEBT SERVICE 28,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $43,000,000

SECTION 3. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
TRANSFER PROVISION. If the State Treasurer should determine that the
appropriations made available for payments of maturing bonds and interest for
the College Savings General Obligation Bonds, the Higher Education General
Obligation Bonds, the State Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement Facilities
General Obligation Bonds, and the State Water Resources Development General
Obligation Bonds are insufficient, appropriation may be transferred from the
Refunds/Reimbursement line item to the Debt Service line item for payment of
said bonds.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 4. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
01/07/2025 2:29:17 PM JAR020

HB1113
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 5. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 6. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.








01/07/2025 2:29:17 PM JAR020